test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_AAN_gt-norm.yaml
     k̲'íinaan+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PRESENT: k̲'íinaan'ang'waa'ahlanggang
     k̲'íinaan+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST: k̲'íinaan'ang'waa'ahlanggan
     k̲'íinaan+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲'íinaan'ang'waa'ahlanggiinii
     k̲'íinaan+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+FUTURE: k̲'íinaan'ang'waaäsaa'ahlans
     k̲'íinaan+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: k̲'íinaan'ang'waa'ahlans
     k̲'íinaan+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTENSIVE+PAST: k̲'íinaan'ang'aawaa'ahlang
     k̲'íinaan+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: k̲'íinaan'ang'aawaa'ahlanggaa
     k̲'íinaan+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: k̲'íinaan'ang'aawaa'ahlanggang
     k̲'íinaan+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+REFLEXIVE: k̲'íinaan'ang'waa'ahl
     k̲'íinaan+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: k̲'íinaan'ang'waaäseehl
